Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1372.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 134 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 134. Advertising and Sponsorships.--* * *(a.1) A public school entity may not pay for or utilize any other form of consideration to sponsor a public event.* * *Section 2. The definitions of "family member" and "school district of residence" in section 1703-A of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1703-A. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible applicant" shall mean a student who:(1) seeks to enroll in a grade level offered by the charter school entity;(2) meets the requirements of 22 Pa. Code §§ 11.12 (relating to school age), 11.13 (relating to compulsory school age), 11.14 (relating to admission to kindergarten when provided), 11.15 (relating to admission of beginners), 11.16 (relating to early admission of beginners) and 12.1 (relating to free education and attendance); and(3) satisfies applicable student residency requirements."Emergency" shall mean a manmade or natural disaster. The term includes a fire, flood, environmental hazard, damage to a school building or other circumstance that impacts or could impact the health or safety of students or staff or renders all or part of a charter school facility unfit for use or occupation."Family member" shall mean a parent, stepparent, child, 20250HB1372PN1568 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stepchild, spouse, domestic partner, brother, sister, stepbrother [or], stepsister[.], grandparent, grandchild, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, aunt, uncle or first cousin.* * *"Public hearing." A meeting held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) at which the contemplated action is considered and members of the public are provided an opportunity to offer comment during the meeting.* * *"School district of residence" shall mean the school district in this Commonwealth in which [the parents or guardians of a child reside.] a child resides as determined under section 1302 and 22 Pa. Code § 11.11(a)(1) (relating to entitlement of resident children to attend public schools).* * *Section 3. Section 1715-A(a) introductory paragraph, (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (8), (9) and (10) introductory paragraph and (c)(1) introductory paragraph and (3) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended to read:Section 1715-A. Charter School Requirements.--(a) [Charter schools] A charter school entity shall be required to comply with the following provisions:(1) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a charter school [is] entity shall be exempt from statutory requirements established in this act, from regulations of the State board and the standards of the secretary not specifically applicable to charter schools. [Charter schools are not] A charter school entity shall not be exempt from statutes applicable to public schools other than this act.20250HB1372PN1568 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A charter school entity shall be accountable to the parents, the public and the Commonwealth, with the delineation of that accountability reflected in the charter. Strategies for meaningful parent and community involvement shall be developed and implemented by each school.(3) A charter school entity shall not unlawfully discriminate in admissions, hiring or operation.(4) A charter school entity shall be nonsectarian in all operations.(5) A charter school entity shall not provide any religious instruction, nor shall it display religious objects and symbols on the premises of the charter school entity.(6) A charter school entity shall not advocate unlawful behavior.* * *(8) A charter school entity shall participate in the Pennsylvania State Assessment System as provided for in 22 Pa. Code Ch. [5 (relating to curriculum), or subsequent regulations promulgated to replace 22 Pa. Code Ch. 5,] 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment) in the manner in which the school district in which the charter school entity is located is scheduled to participate.(9) A charter school entity shall provide a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days of instruction or nine hundred (900) hours per year of instruction at the elementary level, or nine hundred ninety (990) hours per year of instruction at the secondary level. Nothing in this clause shall preclude the use of computer and satellite linkages for delivering instruction to students.(10) Boards of trustees and contractors of [charter schools] 20250HB1372PN1568 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a charter school entity shall be subject to the following statutory requirements governing construction projects and construction-related work:* * *(c) (1) No individual who serves as an administrator for a charter school entity may receive compensation from another charter school entity [or], from an educational management service provider, from a charter school foundation or from a company that provides management or other services to a charter school entity, unless:* * *(3) An administrator of a charter school entity and a family member of the administrator may not serve as a voting member of the board of trustees of the charter school entity that employs the administrator[.] or of a charter school foundation that supports the charter school entity.* * *Section 4. Sections 1716-A(h) and 1722-A(f)(3) and (4) of the act, amended or added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1716-A. Powers of Board of Trustees.--* * *(b.4) A n individual may not serve as a voting member of the board of trustees of a cyber charter school if any of the following apply:(1) The individual or a family member of the individual is employed by, or receives compensation from, the cyber charter school.(2) The individual is employed by either of the following:(i) The board of trustees or board of directors of a charter 20250HB1372PN1568 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school foundation that supports the cyber charter school.(ii) The board of trustees or board of directors of an educational management service provider that contracts with the cyber charter school.(3) The individual serves as a voting member of the board of trustees of another charter school entity.(b.5) A member of the board of trustees of a cyber charter school, or a family membe r of a member of the board of trustees, may not directly or indirectly through any other individual, entity, partnership, corporation in which the member holds stock or a financial interest or through any other organization provide any of the following to the cyber charter school:(1) A loan, forbearance or forgiveness of a loan or other debt.(2) A service or product.(3) A lease of real or personal property.(b.6) A member of the board of trustees of a cyber charter school who violates sub section (b.4) or (b.5) shall be deemed to have violated 65 Pa.C.S. § 1103(a) and shall be subject to the penalties under the jurisdiction of the State Ethics Commission. A contract entered into in violation of subsection (b.4) or (b.5) shall be voidable by a court of competent jurisdiction.* * *(h) A charter school entity may be subject to an annual audit by the Auditor General, in addition to any other audits required by Federal law or this act. A cyber charter school may also be subject to an annual audit by the department or any other entity granted authority to audit cyber charter schools.* * *Section 1722-A. Facilities.--* * *20250HB1372PN1568 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) A school district, intermediate unit, community college and institution under Article XX-A shall provide a cyber charter school with reasonable access to facilities for the administration of standardized testing as follows:* * *(3) A school district, intermediate unit, community college or institution may not be required to make facilities available to a cyber charter school on dates and at times that may cause undue interference with the educational programs or assessment schedule of the school district, intermediate unit, community college or institution.(4) [A] Any facilities rental fee charged to the cyber charter school and the payment of the fee shall be in compliance with the facility rental policy of the school district, intermediate unit, community college or institution that applies generally to all organizations and community groups given access to facilities of the school district, intermediate unit, community college or institution under a rental agreement.(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school district, intermediate unit, community college or institution to provide a cyber charter school with computers or any other devices used by students for the administration of standardized tests.Section 5. Section 1723-A(d)(1) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1723-A. Enrollment.--* * *(d) (1) Enrollment of students in a charter school or cyber charter school shall not be subject to a cap or otherwise limited by any past or future action of a board of school directors, a board of control established under Article XVII-B, 20250HB1372PN1568 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a special board of control established under section 692 or any other governing authority, unless agreed to by the charter school or cyber charter school as part of a written charter pursuant to section 1720-A or 1745-A.(1.1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a cyber charter school that has been designated as a Comprehensive Support and Improvement school under the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) may not expand the cyber charter school's enrollment by more than ten per centum of the enrollment reported by the cyber charter school on the date of the cyber charter school's designation. The limitation under this paragraph shall apply until the cyber charter school exits the designation.* * *Section 6. Section 1725-A(a) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 1725-A. Funding for Charter Schools.--(a) [Funding] Except as provided in section 1725.1-A, funding for a charter school shall be provided in the following manner:* * *Section 7. Section 1725.1-A(b) and (c) introductory paragraph of the act, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1725.1-A. Funding for Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(b) Notwithstanding section [1725-A(a)(3)] 1725-A(a)(2) and (3), per-student funding amounts for special education students attending a cyber charter school shall be calculated in accordance with this section and shall be paid by the school district of residence of each student.20250HB1372PN1568 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) [Effective January 1, 2025, and the entirety of each school year thereafter,] For the 2025-2026 school year, for special education students, a cyber charter school shall receive for each student enrolled the lesser of:* * *(e) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a cyber charter school shall be funded by a student's school district of residence based on the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate . (f) For the 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 school years, the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate for non-special education students shall be eight thousand dollars ($8,000) per student.(g) Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year and every three (3) years thereafter, the department shall adjust the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate based on the average annual property tax increase for all school districts during the preceding three (3) years. The department shall develop guidelines for calculating the adjustment under this subsection. (h) On or before April 30, 2029, and by April 30 of each third year thereafter, the department shall calculate and post on the department's publicly accessible Internet website the updated Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate payable by a student's school district of residence for the next three (3) school years.(i) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, funding for special education students enrolled in a cyber charter school shall be determined as follows:(1) For each special education student, the cyber charter school shall receive the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition 20250HB1372PN1568 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Rate multiplied by one and sixty-four hundredths (1.64).(2) If the cyber charter school determines that the annual expenditure for providing special education services and programs to an enrolled special education student is likely to meet or exceed the expenditure threshold under section 1372(8) for Category 2, the cyber charter school may apply to the department for an increase in the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate for the student.(3) If the department determines that the annual expenditure for providing special education services and programs to the enrolled special education student is likely to meet or exceed the expenditure threshold under section 1372(8) for Category 2, th e department shall direct the student's school district of residence to pay the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate for the student adjusted as follows:(i) For a student enrolled in the cyber charter school for which the annual expenditure is in Category 2, the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate multiplied by three and eight hundredths (3.08).(ii) For a student enrolled in the cyber charter school for which the annual expenditure is in Category 3, including Categories 3A and 3B under section 1372(8), the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate multiplied by six and thirty-four hundredths (6.34).(j) The department shall calculate and publicly post the per-student amounts payable under subsection (i) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website to be paid by a student's school district of residence.(k) To receive funding under subsection (i)(2) and (3), a cyber charter school must submit documentation to the department 20250HB1372PN1568 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demonstrating the likely annual expenditure for special education services and programs for the student in accordance with guidelines developed by the department.(l) The department shall update t he weighting factors under subsection (i) when the weights under section 2509.5(bbb)(2) for school districts are adjusted.(m) The following shall apply:(1) A payment under subsection (i)(3)(ii) may not exceed the actual annual expenditure of providing special education services and programs to the student.(2) If a Category 3 student's actual expenditure for providing special education services and programs is less than the amount received under this section, the cyber charter school shall refund the difference to the student's school district of residence no later than August 1 of each year.(n) The following shall apply: (1) If a student voluntarily enrolls in a cyber charter school, the student or the student's parent or guardian shall pay tuition to the cyber charter school equal to the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate.(2) The payments under paragraph (1) shall be made in twelve (12) equal monthly installments by the fifth day of each month during the school year.(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), the school district of residence shall not be responsible for tuition payments for a a student specified under paragraph (1), and the student shall not be included i n the average daily membership of the school district of residence for the purpose of State funding under Article XXV.(4) The requirements under this subsection shall not apply, 20250HB1372PN1568 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the school district of residence shall be responsible for tuition payments for a student, if:(i) the student was enrolled in a cyber charter school during the 2025-2026 school year; or(ii) the student was enrolled in the school district of residence for at least one full school year prior to enrolling in the cyber charter school.Section 8. Section 1741-A(a)(1), (2), (3) and (5), (b) and (c) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1741-A. Powers and duties of department.(a) Powers and duties.--The department shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Receive, review and act on applications for the creation of a cyber charter school [and have], including, but not limited to, the power to request further information from applicants, obtain input from interested persons or entities and hold public hearings regarding applications. The department shall hold at least one public hearing prior to granting or denying an application.(2) [Renew] Receive, review and act on applications to amend and renew the charter of a cyber charter school. [and renew the charter of a charter school approved under section 1717-A or 1718-A which provides instruction through the Internet or other electronic means. Upon renewal of a charter of a charter school approved under section 1717-A or 1718-A, the charter school shall qualify as a cyber charter school under this subdivision and shall be subject to the provisions of this subdivision.](3) Revoke or deny renewal of a cyber charter school's 20250HB1372PN1568 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charter under the provisions of section [1729-A] 1745.3-A.[(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1729-A(i), when the department has revoked or denied renewal of a charter, the cyber charter school shall be dissolved. After the disposition of the liabilities and obligations of the cyber charter school, any remaining assets of the cyber charter school shall be given over to the intermediate unit in which the cyber charter school's administrative office was located for distribution to the school districts in which the students enrolled in the cyber charter school reside at the time of dissolution.(ii) Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, the department may, after notice and hearing, take immediate action to revoke a charter if:(A) a material component of the student's education as required under this subdivision is not being provided; or(B) the cyber charter school has failed to maintain the financial ability to provide services as required under this subdivision.]* * * [(5) Develop forms, including the notification form under section 1748-A(b), necessary to carry out the provisions of this subdivision.](b) Hearings.--[Hearings] Public hearings conducted by the department shall be conducted under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(c) Documents.--Documents of the appeal board shall be subject to the act of [June 21, 1957 (P.L.390, No.212), referred to as the Right-to-Know Law.] February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), 20250HB1372PN1568 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Standard enrollment form.--(1) The department shall develop a standard enrollment form, in both paper and electronic formats, which shall be used by an eligible applicant seeking to enroll in a cyber charter school. The enrollment form shall be limited to information necessary to identify the student, determine grade level and establish residency, including all of the following:(i) The student's name, residential address, resident school district, telephone number, date of birth, current grade level and grade level to be entered.(ii) The name, residential address and telephone number or email address of the student's parent or guardian.(iii) The proposed date and grade level of enrollment.(iv) The name of the cyber charter school and the contact information, including the name, telephone number and email address, of an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.(v) The signatures of the student's parent or guardian and an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.(2) The standard enrollment form shall be made physically available at each cyber charter school location, in a manner that complies with Federal and State law, and posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the cyber charter school. A cyber charter school may accept the enrollment form via paper or electronic means.20250HB1372PN1568 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The standard enrollment form shall be: (i) physically available at each cyber charter school location in a format compliant with Federal and State law; and(ii) posted on the cyber charter school's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) A cyber charter school may not request or require additional information beyond what is contained in the standard enrollment form as developed by the department.(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a cyber charter school, after a student is accepted for admission and has expressed intent to enroll, from requesting records and information that public schools are otherwise entitled to receive.Section 9. Section 1742-A(1) and (3) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1742-A. Assessment and evaluation.The department shall:(1) Annually assess whether each cyber charter school is meeting the goals of its charter and is in compliance with the provisions of the [charter and conduct a comprehensive review prior to granting a five-year renewal of the] charter. The assessment may include, but shall not be limited to, an examination of all of the following:(i) Academic performance.(ii) Financial management.(iii) Audit results.(iv) Governance and operation.(v) Compliance with Federal and State laws and regulations.20250HB1372PN1568 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) Have ongoing access to all records, systems, facilities, instructional materials and student and staff records of each cyber charter school [and to every cyber charter school facility to] and any related charter school foundation or educational management service provider to facilitate the annual and comprehensive reviews required under this subsection and to ensure the cyber charter school is in compliance with its charter and this [subdivision.] article and that requirements for testing, civil rights and student health and safety are being met.(4) Conduct a comprehensive review of each cyber charter school prior to granting a charter renewal. The comprehensive review may include, but shall not be limited to, an examination of all of the following:(i) Academic performance.(ii) Financial management.(iii) Audit results.(iv) Governance and operation.(v) Compliance with Federal and State laws and regulations.Section 10. Section 1743-A(a), (b), (c), (d)(1) and (11), (e), (f), (g) and (h) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1743-A. Cyber charter school requirements and prohibitions.(a) Special financial requirements prohibited.--A cyber charter school shall not:(1) provide discounts to a school district or waive payments under section [1725-A] 1725.1-A for any student;20250HB1372PN1568 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) [except as provided for in subsection (e),] provide payments or reimbursements to parents or guardians for the purchase of instructional materials[; or], for educational or field trips or for any other reason not expressly specified under subsection (e);(2.1) offer or provide to parents, guardians or students cash, gifts or other incentives having more than a de minimis value for enrolling in, attending or considering enrollment or attendance in the cyber charter school; or(3) except as compensation for the provision of specific services, enter into agreements to provide funds to a school entity.(b) Enrollment.--A cyber charter school shall report to the department an increase or a decrease of 30% or more in its anticipated enrollment set forth in the application under section [1747-A(11)] 1747-A(3).(c) School district.--A cyber charter school shall make available upon request, either in writing or electronically, to each student's school district of residence the following:(1) A copy of the charter.(2) A copy of the cyber charter school application.(3) A copy of all annual reports prepared by the cyber charter school under this article.(4) A list of all students from that school district enrolled in the cyber charter school.(5) Information required under section 1725.1-A.(d) Parent or guardian.--Upon request and prior to the student's first day in a cyber charter school, the cyber charter school shall, either in writing or electronically, provide to the parent or guardian of a student the following:20250HB1372PN1568 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A current list and brief description of the courses of instruction the student will receive. The list shall be updated annually for each grade level in which the student is enrolled.* * *(11) Information on:(i) The cyber charter school's professional staff, including the number of staff personnel, their education level and experience.(ii) The cyber charter school's performance on the PSSA and other standardized test scores.(iii) The cyber charter school's graduation rate, if applicable.(iv) The cyber charter school's designation as a Comprehensive Support and Improvement school, Targeted Support and Improvement school or an Additional Targeted Support and Improvement school under the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) along with a description of the designation, if applicable.* * *(e) Students.--For each student enrolled, a cyber charter school shall:(1) provide all instructional materials, which may include electronic or digital books in place of paper books;(2) provide all equipment, including, but not limited to, a computer, computer monitor and printer, unless the parent or guardian of an enrolled child elects not to receive a computer, computer monitor or printer; and(3) provide or reimburse for [all] technology and services necessary for the [on-line] online delivery of the 20250HB1372PN1568 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 curriculum and instruction. The department shall establish a maximum allowable reimbursement rate for the technology and services required under this paragraph.(e.1) Liability.--The Commonwealth and school district of residence shall not be liable for any reimbursement owed to students, parents or guardians by a cyber charter school under [paragraph (3)] subsection (e)(3).(f) Annual report.--A cyber charter school shall submit an annual report no later than August 1 of each year to the department and all local boards of school directors that have a student enrolled in the cyber charter school in the form prescribed by the department. The following shall apply to the annual report:(1) The annual report shall include, but not be limited to, the number of students who enroll in the cyber charter school and the number of those students who are identified by the cyber charter school as needing special education as well as the level of services being provided to the student.(2) A copy of the annual report, including all exhibits and attachments to the annual report, shall also be maintained at each facility of the cyber charter school and be made available for public inspection and copying and shall be posted on the cyber charter school's publicly accessible Internet website.(g) [Records and facilities.--A cyber charter school shall provide the department with ongoing access to all records and facilities necessary for the department to assess the cyber charter school in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision.] Employee evaluations.--A cyber charter school shall use the revised rating system under subarticle (c.1) of 20250HB1372PN1568 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Article XI to evaluate principals or school leaders, classroom teachers and nonteaching professional employees.(h) Offices and facilities.--A cyber charter school shall maintain an administrative office within this Commonwealth where all student records shall be maintained at all times and shall provide the department with the addresses of all offices and facilities of the cyber charter school, the ownership thereof and any lease arrangements. The administrative office of the cyber charter school shall be considered as the principal place of business for service of process for any action brought against the cyber charter school or cyber charter school staff members. The cyber charter school shall notify the department of any changes in this information within [ten] 10 days of the change.* * *(j) Educational agreements.--A cyber charter school may enter into agreements with school districts or any other public or private schools located in this Commonwealth for the provision of programs, courses or other educational services.(k) Budget.--(1) By June 30 each year, a cyber charter school shall annually adopt and submit to the department and each school district which has a student enrolled with a copy of the cyber charter school's annual budget on a form developed by the department. For the purpose of this paragraph, a cyber charter school shall provide no more information than provided by a school district under section 687.(2) The cyber charter school shall print or otherwise make available for public inspection a copy of the cyber charter school's proposed annual budget at least 20 days 20250HB1372PN1568 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to the adoption of the final budget. The cyber charter school shall also post a copy of the cyber charter school's proposed annual budget on its publicly accessible Internet website.(3) On the date of adoption of the proposed annual budget required under this subsection, the president or chair of the cyber charter school's board of trustees shall certify to the department that the proposed budget has been prepared, presented and made available for public inspection using a form developed by the department. The certification under this paragraph shall be in a manner required by the department. Final action shall not be taken on a proposed annual budget that has not been prepared, presented and made available for public inspection using a form developed by the department.(4) The annual budget adopted and submitted under this subsection shall not exceed the amount of funds available to the cyber charter school.(l) Accessibility.--A cyber charter school or affiliated charter school foundation shall make copies of the following available upon request and on the cyber charter school's or charter school foundation's publicly accessible Internet website:(1) Annual budgets for the cyber charter school, as specified under subsection (k), and the charter school foundation for the most recent five school years, as available. A charter school foundation shall include in its annual budget the salaries of all employees of the charter school foundation.(2) Annual Federal and State tax filings, including 20250HB1372PN1568 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internal Revenue Service Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt from Income Tax and all related schedules and appendices for the cyber charter school and charter school foundation for the previous five school years.(3) Certified audits under section 1716-A(f) and each Federal and State audit under section 1716-A(h) for the cyber charter school and the charter school foundation for the previous five school years, as available.(4) Annual reports filed by the cyber charter school under subsection (f) for the previous five school years, as available.Section 11. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1743.1-A. Fund balance limits.(a) Limitation.--For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter, a cyber charter school may not accumulate an unassigned fund balance that exceeds the following:Cyber Charter SchoolTotal Budgeted Expenditures Estimated EndingUnassigned Fund Balanceas Percentage of TotalBudgeted ExpendituresLess Than or Equal to $11,999,999 12%Between $12,000,000 and $12,999,999 11.5%Between $13,000,000 and $13,999,999 11%Between $14,000,000 and $14,999,999 10.5%Between $15,000,000 and $15,999,999 10%Between $16,000,000 and $16,999,999 9.5%Between $17,000,000 and $17,999,999 9%Between $18,000,000 and $18,999,999 8.5%Greater Than or Equal to $19,000,000 8%20250HB1372PN1568 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Refund.--An unassigned fund balance in place on June 30, 2025, and on June 30 of each year thereafter, in excess of the fund balance limit established under subsection (a) shall be refunded on a pro rata basis within 90 days to each school district that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year, based upon the number of students for whom each school district paid tuition to the cyber charter school multiplied by the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate under section 1725.1-A.(c) Information.--By October 31, 2025, and by October 31 of each year thereafter, a cyber charter school shall provide the department and each school district that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year with information certifying compliance with this section. The information shall be provided in a form and manner determined by the department and shall include information on the cyber charter school's estimated ending unassigned fund balance expressed as a dollar amount and as a percentage of the cyber charter school's total budgeted expenditures for that school year.(d) Prohibition.--Unassigned funds of the cyber charter school in excess of the unassigned fund balance may not be used to pay bonuses to an administrator, a member of the board of trustees, an employee, a staff member or a contractor and may not be transferred to a charter school foundation. If a cyber charter school uses funds in excess of the unassigned fund balance limit in violation of this subsection, the value of the bonus payment or fund transfer shall be refunded on a pro rata basis to each school district that paid tuition to the cyber charter school in the prior school year, based upon the number of students for whom each school district paid tuition to the 20250HB1372PN1568 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cyber charter school multiplied by the Statewide Cyber Charter School Tuition Rate under section 1725.1-A.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "unassigned fund balance" means that portion of the fund balance of a cyber charter school that is appropriable for expenditure or not legally or otherwise segregated for a specific or tentative future use, projected for the close of the school year for which the cyber charter school's budget was adopted and held in the General Fund accounts of the cyber charter school.Section 1743.2-A. Educational management service providers.(a) Service providers.--An educational management service provider that provides a service to a cyber charter school shall:(1) be considered a local agency for the purpose of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law; and(2) maintain a publicly accessible Internet website detailing the salaries and other compensation and titles of the educational management service provider's employees, officers and directors.(b) Employees.--An employee of an educational management service provider that provides a service to a cyber charter school shall be considered a public employee for the purpose of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).Section 12. Sections 1744-A(1) and (4) and 1745-A(c), (e), (f)(1)(v) and (2) and (h) of the act are amended to read:Section 1744-A. School district and intermediate unit responsibilities.An intermediate unit or a school district in which a student 20250HB1372PN1568 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrolled in a cyber charter school resides shall do all of the following:(1) Provide the cyber charter school within [ten] 10 days of receipt of the notice of the admission of the student under section 1748-A(a) with all records relating to the student, including transcripts, test scores and a copy of any individualized education program for that student.* * *(4) Make payments to the cyber charter school under section [1725-A] 1725.1-A.Section 1745-A. Establishment of cyber charter school.* * *(c) Attendance.--(1) Attendance at a cyber charter school shall satisfy requirements for compulsory attendance.(2) On a form developed by the department and beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, a cyber charter school shall report, on a weekly basis, the attendance of each student for the preceding week to the school district of residence.* * *(e) Grant or denial.--Within 120 days of receipt of an application, the department shall grant or deny the application. The department shall review the application and shall hold at least one public hearing [under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings)]. At least 30 days prior to the hearing, the department shall publish in the Pennsylvania Bulletin and on the department's [World Wide Web site] publicly accessible Internet website notice of the hearing and the purpose of the application.(f) Evaluation criteria.--20250HB1372PN1568 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A cyber charter school application submitted under this subdivision shall be evaluated by the department based on the following criteria:* * * (v) The extent to which the cyber charter school may serve as a model for other public schools, including other cyber charter schools.(2) Written notice of the action of the department shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant and published on the department's [World Wide Web site] publicly accessible Internet website. If the application is denied, the reasons for denial, including a description of deficiencies in the application, shall be clearly stated in the notice.* * * (h) Appeal.--If the department fails to hold the required public hearing or [to approve or disapprove] denies the [charter] application, the applicant may file its application as an appeal to the appeal board in accordance with section 1746-A. The appeal board shall provide notice of the appeal to the department and may allow the department to be heard on the application. If the department fails to respond within 30 days, the appeal board shall review the application and make a decision to approve or disapprove the charter based on the criteria in subsection (f). The applicant must file an appeal no later than 30 days following the date by which the department was required to act on the application in accordance with subsection (e) or (g), as applicable, or the date of mailing of the written notice issued under subsection (f)(2).Section 13. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1745.1-A. Renewal of charters.20250HB1372PN1568 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Submission.--A cyber charter school shall submit a renewal application as provided under section 1747-A(d) to the department by October 1 of the final year of the charter term.(b) Action. -- The department shall act to renew or not renew a charter no later than 120 days after receipt of a complete renewal application. The department may, in its sole discretion, hold a public hearing to discuss the renewal.(c) Extension. --A renewal of a charter s hall obligate the department to extend the charter in accordance with section 1745-A(f)(3).(d) Appeals.--Unless otherwise provided in this article, a cyber charter school that appeals a nonrenewal may continue operating under the terms and conditions of the most recent charter pending the decision of the appeal board.Section 1745.2-A. Charter amendments.(a) Filing.-- Subject to subsections (b) and (c), a cyber charter school may request amendments to its charter by filing an amendment application describing the requested amendment with the department no later than October 15 of the school year prior to the school year in which the amendment would take effect. Approval from the department shall be required only for a change to a material term of a written charter.(b) Emergencies.-- Notwith standing the notice requirements of subsection (a), in the event of an emergency, a cyber charter school shall immediately notify the department of the necessity for an emergency amendment, which shall take effect immediately as a temporary amendment pending completion of the processes specified under this section.(c) Deadline.--A cyber charter school may not seek an amendment during the first year of the charter term. A cyber 20250HB1372PN1568 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charter school seeking an amendment during the final year of the charter term shall submit the amendment application along with the renewal application under section 1745.1-A.(d) Form.--The department shall create a model amendment application form for a cyber charter school seeking to amend its approved written charter agreement. The department shall transmit the form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post the form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The following shall apply:(1) The model amendment application shall include the following information:(i) The name of the cyber charter school.(ii) The name and contact information for the chief administrator and the president or chairperson of the board of trustees.(iii) The physical location of the cyber charter school, the ownership of the cyber charter school and any lease arrangements.(iv) The proposed amendments to the approved written charter agreement and the reasons for the amendments.(v) Evidence of the vote by the board of trustees approving submission of the amendment request.(2) The department shall review the model amendment application form at least every three years, with stakeholder input, and shall revise the form as necessary.(e ) Supplements . -- Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the department from supplementing the model application form or requiring additional information necessary to evaluate the application in accordance with this act.20250HB1372PN1568 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Posting.--T he department shall post the model amendment form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website no later than August 1, 2025.(g) Use.--A charter school entity shall use the model application form beginning in the 2025-2026 school year.(h) Hearing.--Within 60 days of receipt by the department of a charter amendment application, the department shall hold a public hearing on the proposed charter amendment.(i) Action.--Within 180 days of the receipt by the department of the charter amendment request, the department shall grant or deny the request. The department shall provide written notice of the department's determination to the cyber charter school.(j) Approval.-- If the amendment request is granted by the department under subsection (i), the cyber charter school's written charter shall be supplemented or amended, as appropriate, to contain the provisions of the amendment request and signed by the department and the president or chairperson of the cyber charter school's board of trustees. The amended charter, when signed as required under this subsection, shall constitute legal authorization for continued operation under the amended terms for the remainder of the charter term.(k) Denial.-- If the amendment request is denied by the department under subsection (i), the department shall clearly state the reasons for the denial, including any deficiencies, in the written notice sent by the department to the cyber charter school. The cyber charter school may appeal the denial to the appeal board in accordance with section 1746-A. A denial shall not preclude future resubmission of the amendment request by the cyber charter school to address the deficiencies identified by 20250HB1372PN1568 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department in its written notice denying the amendment request.(l) Request at renewal.-- Notwithstanding subsection (a), a cyber charter school may request an ame ndment to its charter at the time of renewal. Charter amendment requests made at the time of renewal shall be considered distinct requests subject to independent approval or denial by the department in accordance with this section.(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "change to a material term" means any of the following:(1) A change to the name of the cyber charter school.(2) A change in building location or addition of a new facility.(3) A change in educational management service provider.(4) A change to curriculum provider.(5) A change to mission or educational goals of the cyber charter school.(6) A change to grade levels served other than those included in the approved charter application even if those grades are not currently implemented.(7) Expansion of enrollment based on the maximum authorized enrollment for the term of the charter.Section 1745.3-A. Causes for nonrenewal, revocation or termination.(a) Revocation or nonrenewal.--During the term of a charter or at the end of the term of the charter, the department may choose to revoke or not to renew the charter based on any of the following:(1) A material violation of a condition, standard or procedure contained in the written charter signed under 20250HB1372PN1568 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 1745-A.(2) Failure to meet the requirements for student performance specified in 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment).(3) Failure to meet any performance targets specified in the written charter signed under section 1745-A.(4) Designation by the department as a Comprehensive Support and Improvement school at least two times under the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802).(5) Failure to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management or audit requirements.(6) Violation of a provision of this article.(7) Violation of a provision of law from which the charter school has not been exempted, including a Federal law or regulation governing children with disabilities.(8) The cyber charter school has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge involving fraud.(9) Failure of the cyber charter school or an administrator or member of the board of trustees of the cyber charter school to comply with any of the following:(i) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).(ii) 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure) or any other conflict of interest prohibition in this article.(iii) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(10) Failure to timely comply with auditing requirements from which the cyber charter school has not been exempted.20250HB1372PN1568 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) Failure to timely comply with reporting requirements from which the charter school has not been exempted, including the submission of an annual budget required by section 1743-A(k), an annual financial report required by section 218 and the annual report required by section 1743-A(f).(12) Failure to provide ongoing access to the records and facilities of the cyber charter school as required by section 1742-A(3).(13) A reason to revoke or not renew the charter as specified in regulations promulgated by the department.(b) Notice and hearings.--(1) The department shall provide a notice of revocation or nonrenewal of a charter in writing to a cyber charter school, state the grounds for the action with reasonable specificity and give reasonable notice to the board of trustees of the cyber charter school of the date on which a public hearing concerning the revocation or nonrenewal will be held.(2) The department shall conduct the public hearing under paragraph (1), present evidence in support of the grounds for revocation or nonrenewal stated in the notice of revocation or nonrenewal and provide the cyber charter school reasonable opportunity to offer testimony before taking final action.(3) The department shall take formal action revoking or not renewing a charter at the public meeting under paragraph (1) in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 after the public has a 30-day period to provide comments to the board of trustees of the cyber charter school.20250HB1372PN1568 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) No later than 60 days after the public meeting under paragraph (1) in which a formal action is taken by the department under paragraph (3), the department shall provide written notice of the department's determination to revoke or not renew the charter to the cyber charter school.(5) Proceedings of the department under this subsection shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). Except as provided in subsection (c), the determination of the department to revoke or not renew the charter shall not be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(c) Appeals.--A cyber charter school may appeal the determination of the department to revoke or not renew the charter under subsection (b) to the appeal board. The cyber charter school must file the appeal with the appeal board no later than 60 days after issuance of the department's determination. The appeal board shall have the exclusive review of a department's determination to revoke or not renew the charter. The appeal board shall review the record and have the discretion to supplement the record if the supplemental information was previously unavailable. The appeal board may consider the charter school plan, annual reports and student performance in addition to the record. The appeal board shall determine whether the department's determination to revoke or not renew the charter was arbitrary and capricious and specifically articulate the appeal board's reasons for its findings in a written decision.(d) Effect.--Except as specified under subsection (e), the charter shall remain in effect until final disposition by the 20250HB1372PN1568 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appeal board under subsection (c). If the appeal board upholds a determination of the department that the charter should be revoked or not renewed, the charter shall remain in effect until the end of the school year or other such time as the appeal board directs.(e) Immediate action.--The department may, after notice and hearing, take immediate action to revoke a charter if any of the following apply:(1) A material component of the student's education as required under this subdivision is not being provided.(2) The cyber charter school has failed to maintain the financial ability to provide services as required under this subdivision.(3) The health or safety of the cyber charter school's pupils or staff is at serious risk.(f) Dissolution.--If a charter is revoked, not renewed, forfeited, surrendered or otherwise ceases to operate, the cyber charter school shall be dissolved. After the disposition of any liabilities and obligations of the cyber charter school, any remaining assets of the cyber charter school, both real and personal, shall be distributed on a proportional basis to each school entity with students enrolled in the cyber charter school for the last full or partial school year of the cyber charter school. A school entity or the Commonwealth may not be liable for any outstanding liabilities or obligations of the cyber charter school.(g) Enrollment.--If a charter is revoked or is not renewed, a student who attended the cyber charter school shall be enrolled in another public school or another school or program which legally fulfills the compulsory school attendance 20250HB1372PN1568 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this act. The normal application deadlines for the school or program shall not apply if a charter is revoked or is not renewed. The cyber charter school shall forward the student records maintained by the cyber charter school to the student's new school within 10 days of the student's enrollment.Section 14. Sections 1746-A(a) and (b)(5) and 1747-A of the act are amended to read:Section 1746-A. State Charter School Appeal Board review.(a) Jurisdiction.--The appeal board shall have the exclusive review of an appeal by a cyber charter school applicant or by the board of trustees of a cyber charter school on the decisions of the department, including:(1) The denial of an application for a charter.(2) The denial of a renewal of a charter.(3) The revocation of a charter.(4) An appeal under section 1745-A(h).(5) The denial of an amendment application.(b) Procedure.--The appeal board shall:* * * (5) In the case of a decision by the department to revoke or deny renewal of a cyber school charter in accordance with section 1741-A(a)(3), make its decision based on section [1729-A(a)] 1745.3-A(a). A decision of the appeal board to reverse the decision of the department to not revoke or deny renewal of a charter shall serve as a requirement of the department to not revoke or to not deny renewal of the charter of the cyber charter school. The appeal board shall specify its findings in a written decision. If the appeal board decides that the charter should be revoked or not renewed, the charter shall remain in effect until the end of 20250HB1372PN1568 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the school year or another time as the appeal board directs.* * *Section 1747-A. Cyber charter school application.[In addition to the provisions of section 1719-A, an application to establish a cyber charter school shall also include the following:(1) The curriculum to be offered and how it meets the requirements of 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessment) or subsequent regulations promulgated to replace 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4.(2) The number of courses required for elementary and secondary students.](a) Application form.--The department shall create and publish a model application form, in electronic format, that an applicant seeking to establish a cyber charter school shall, at a minimum, complete as part of its application. The department shall transmit the model application form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post the model application form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The model application form shall include all of the following information:(1) The identification of and contact information for the applicant.(2) The name of the proposed charter school entity, which shall include the words "cyber charter school" in the name.(3) The grade or age levels served by the cyber charter school and the anticipated enrollment levels during each school year of the proposed charter, including expected increases due to the addition of grade levels.20250HB1372PN1568 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The proposed governance structure of the cyber charter school, including all of the following:(i) A clear description of the method for the appointment or selection of members of the board of trustees.(ii) A copy of the articles of incorporation filed with the Department of State.(iii) A copy of the bylaws, operating agreement or equivalent document adopted by the applicant for the general governance of the cyber charter school.(iv) An organization chart clearly presenting the proposed governance structure of the cyber charter school, including lines of authority and reporting between the board of trustees, administrators, staff and any educational management service provider that will provide services to the cyber charter school.(5) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the board of trustees, administrators and any other entities, including a charter school foundation and any educational management service provider that will provide educational management services to the cyber charter school, shown in the organization chart.(6) Standards for board of trustees' performance, including compliance with applicable laws, regulations and terms of the charter.(7) If the cyber charter school intends to contract with an educational management service provider for services, all of the following:(i) Evidence of the educational management service provider's record in each school where the provider 20250HB1372PN1568 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provides or has provided services for student populations, including demonstrated academic achievement and growth and demonstrated management of nonacademic school functions, including proficiency with public school-based accounting, if applicable.(ii) Evidence that the board of trustees has reviewed each service to be provided and determined, through competitive bidding or at least three quotes for professional services, that each service to be provided by the educational management service provider is provided at fair market value.(iii) The complete proposed contract or agreement between the cyber charter school and the educational management service provider stating all of the following:(A) The officers, chief administrator and administrators of the educational management service provider.(B) The proposed duration of the service contract or agreement. The service contract or agreement shall provide for the following:(I) An educational management service provider may not terminate the contract or agreement without providing at least six months' notice to the cyber charter school unless expressly agreed to by the board of trustees of the cyber charter school.(II) An agreement or contract shall terminate upon closure of the cyber charter school unless the board of trustees of the cyber charter school and the educational management 20250HB1372PN1568 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service provider agree in writing that the educational service provider will provide services related to the dissolution of the cyber charter school.(C) Roles and responsibilities of the board of trustees, the cyber charter school staff and the educational management service provider. The board of trustees shall retain ultimate and actual authority for the operation of the school, and the school shall be independent of the educational management service provider.(D) The scope of services, personnel and resources to be provided by the educational management service provider, which shall meet the following requirements:(I) Each service provided by the educational management service provider and the cost for the service shall be separately identified and invoiced or billed separately.(II) Each service provided by the educational management service provider shall be severable so that the board of trustees of the cyber charter school may terminate or make revisions to one service without termination or revision by the educational management service provider of any other service, except by express agreement of the board of trustees of the cyber charter school.(III) An educational management service provider may not provide business services to the 20250HB1372PN1568 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cyber charter school if the provider is also providing other services to the cyber charter school under the contract or agreement unless the board of trustees has established procedures to ensure that individual payments to the educational management service provider are reviewed and authorized by an administrator of the cyber charter school and the board of trustees of the cyber charter school.(E) Performance evaluation measures and timelines.(F) The compensation structure, including clear identification of fees to be paid to the educational management service provider. The educational management service provider may not charge a percentage or contingency fee for services.(G) Methods of oversight and enforcement of the contract or agreement.(H) Investment disclosure or the advance of money by the educational management service provider on behalf of the cyber charter school with clear repayment terms.(I) Conditions for renewal and termination of the contract or agreement.(iv) Disclosure and explanation of any existing or potential conflicts of interest between the members of the board of trustees of the cyber charter school or members of the board of trustees or directors of the charter school foundation and the proposed educational management service provider or any affiliated entities, 20250HB1372PN1568 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including a charter school foundation qualified as a support organization under 26 U.S.C. (relating to Internal Revenue Code).(v) A contract with an educational management service provider may not be executed until the charter agreement is signed under section 1745-A(f)(3).(8) The mission and education goals of the cyber charter school, the curriculum to be offered that complies with 22 Pa. Code Ch. 4 (relating to academic standards and assessments) and the methods of assessing whether students are meeting educational goals, including performance targets.(9) The admission and enrollment policy, including criteria for evaluating the admission of students, which shall comply with the requirements under section 1723-A.(10) Procedures that will be used regarding the suspension or expulsion of pupils, which shall comply with the requirements under section 1318 and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 12 (relating to students and student services).(11) Information on the manner in which community groups will be involved in the cyber charter school planning process.(12) The financial plan for the cyber charter school, including annual budgets for the first three years of operation of the cyber charter school, and the procedures for auditing the school in accordance with sections 437 and 1716-A, including the role of any charter school foundation.(13) A description of funds available to the cyber charter school for planning and operation prior to receipt of funds under section 1725.1-A.(14) Procedures to review complaints of parents and 20250HB1372PN1568 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guardians regarding the operation of the cyber charter school.(15) A description and address of each physical facility where the cyber charter school will be located or operating, including information regarding each facility's size, location, amenities, ownership, availability for lease or purchase, projected improvements and financing.(16) Information on the proposed school calendar for the cyber charter school, including the length of the school day and school year consistent with sections 1501 and 1502.(17) The proposed faculty, if already determined, and a professional development and continuing education plan for the faculty and professional staff of the cyber charter school.(18) Whether an agreement has been entered into or a plan developed with the local school district regarding participation of the cyber charter school's students in extracurricular activities within the school district.(19) A plan for satisfying the criminal history and child abuse clearance requirements and employment history reviews required by Federal and State law.(20) Documentation that the cyber charter school possesses and maintains adequate and appropriate insurance, bond or other security for the cyber charter school, including the board of trustees and employees of the charter school, to prevent a cyber charter school's outstanding liabilities and obligations from being imposed upon a school entity or the Commonwealth, or otherwise affect the rights, benefits or remedies available to the students, parents or employees of the cyber charter school. The department shall 20250HB1372PN1568 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgate regulations specifying the minimum security requirements sufficient to guarantee payment of the cyber charter school's liabilities in accordance with this article.(21) Policies regarding truancy, absences and withdrawal of students, including the manner in which the cyber charter school will monitor and enforce attendance and will comply with the truancy provisions under Article XIII.(22) Whether or not the cyber charter school will seek accreditation by a nationally recognized accreditation agency, including the Middle States Association of Colleges and Schools or another regional institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education or an equivalent federally recognized body for charter school education.[(3)] (23) An explanation of the amount of [on-line] online time required for elementary and secondary students.[(4)] (24) The manner in which teachers will deliver instruction, assess academic progress and communicate with students to provide assistance.[(5)] (25) A specific explanation of any cooperative learning opportunities, meetings with students, parents and guardians, field trips or study sessions.[(6)] (26) The technology, including types of hardware and software, equipment and other materials which will be provided by the cyber charter school to the student.[(7)] (27) A description of how the cyber charter school will define and monitor a student's school day, including the delineation of [on-line and off-line time] online time and for independent coursework.[(8)] (28) A description of commercially prepared 20250HB1372PN1568 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standardized achievement tests that will be used by the cyber charter school in addition to the Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test and Keystone Exams, including the grade levels that will be tested and how the data collected from the tests will be used to improve instruction.[(9)] (29) The technical support that will be available to students and parents or guardians.[(10)] (30) The privacy and security measures to ensure the confidentiality of data gathered online.[(11) The level of anticipated enrollment during each school year of the proposed charter, including expected increases due to the addition of grade levels.(12)] (31) The methods to be used to [insure] ensure the authenticity of student work and adequate proctoring of examinations.[(13)] (32) The provision of education and related services to students with disabilities, including evaluation and the development and revision of individualized education programs.[(14) Policies regarding truancy, absences and withdrawal of students, including the manner in which the cyber charter school will monitor attendance consistent with the provisions of section 1715-A(9).(15)] (33) The types and frequency of communication between the cyber charter school and the student and the manner in which the cyber charter school will communicate with parents and guardians.[(16) The addresses of all facilities and offices of the cyber charter school, the ownership thereof and any lease arrangements.]20250HB1372PN1568 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (34) Any other information required by the department.(b) Lease prohibition.--A cyber charter school may not enter into a lease for a facility with an educational management service provider or charter school foundation.(c) Extracurricular activity.--A school district of residence may not prohibit a student of a cyber charter school from participating in an extracurricular activity of the school district of residence if the student is able to fulfill the requirements of participation in the activity and the charter school does not provide the same extracurricular activity. The school district of residence may charge the cyber charter school a reasonable amount for a cyber charter school student's participation in the school district's extracurricular activity, which may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the school district for participation by the school district's students in the activity. A cyber charter school student may not be required to pay a fee also not paid by a student enrolled in the school district for participation in the extracurricular activity.(d) Renewal application form.--The department shall create and publish a model renewal application form, in electronic format, that a cyber charter school seeking renewal of the cyber charter school's charter shall, at a minimum, complete as part of the cyber charter school's renewal application. The department shall transmit the form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post the form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The form shall include all of the following:(1) The name and contact information for the chief administrator and president or chairperson of the board of 20250HB1372PN1568 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 trustees of the cyber charter school.(2) Whether the cyber charter school is seeking an amendment to the school's current charter.(3) Other information deemed necessary by the department.(e) Review.--The department shall review the model application and renewal application forms at least every three years with feedback and input from stakeholders and revise the application forms as needed.(f) Changes.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the department from supplementing the established model application and renewal application forms or requiring additional information permitted by this act as necessary to evaluate a renewal application.(g) Posting.--The department shall post the model application and renewal application forms on the department's publicly accessible Internet website no later than August 1, 2025.(h) Use.--A cyber charter school applicant or cyber charter school operator shall use the model application and renewal application forms beginning in the 2025-2026 school year.Section 15. Section 1748-A(a)(1) and (2)(vi) and (vii), (b) and (c) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1748-A. Enrollment and notification.(a) Notice to school district.--(1) Within 10 days of the enrollment of a student to a cyber charter school, the [parent or guardian and the] cyber charter school shall notify the student's school district of 20250HB1372PN1568 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residence of the enrollment [through the use of the notification form] under subsection (b).(2) If a school district which has received notice under paragraph (1) determines that a student is not a resident of the school district, the following apply:* * *(vi) A school district shall continue to make payments to a cyber charter school under section [1725-A] 1725.1-A during the time in which the school district of residence of a student is in dispute.(vii) If a final determination is made that a student is not a resident of an appealing school district, the cyber charter school shall return all funds provided on behalf of that student to the school district within 30 days and seek payment from the school district of residence.[(b) Notification form.--The department shall develop a notification form for use under subsection (a). The notification shall include:(1) The name, home address and mailing address of the student.(2) The grade in which the student is being enrolled.(3) The date the student will be enrolled.(4) The name and address of the cyber charter school and the name and telephone number of a contact person able to provide information regarding the cyber charter school.(5) The signature of the parent or guardian and an authorized representative of the cyber charter school.](b.1) Notification.--The notification required under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:20250HB1372PN1568 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The enrollment form filed with the cyber charter school by the student or the parent or guardian.(2) A certification that the cyber charter school verified the residency of the student.(c) Withdrawal.--The cyber charter school [and the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in a cyber charter school] shall provide written notification to the student's school district of residence and the department within 10 days following the withdrawal of a student from the cyber charter school.(d) Nonrenewal or termination.--Upon notification of the nonrenewal or termination of a charter under section 1745.3-A, a cyber charter school may not enroll new students unless the cyber charter school files an appeal to the appeal board under section 1746-A. Upon a vote by the board of trustees of the cyber charter school to close the cyber charter school, the cyber charter school may not enroll new students and shall provide notice of the closure to each parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the cyber charter school, a time period for the cyber school's closure and information on enrolling in another public school.Section 16. Section 1749-A(a)(1) of the act, reenacted and amended October 31, 2024 (P.L.1129, No.135), is amended, the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1749-A. Applicability of other provisions of this act and of other acts and regulations.(a) General requirements.--Cyber charter schools shall be subject to the following:(1) The following:(i) Section 108.20250HB1372PN1568 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Section 110.(iii) Section 111.(iv) Section 321.(v) Section 325.(vi) Section 326.(vii) Section 327.(viii) Section 431.(ix) Section 436.(x) Section 443.(xi) Section 510.(xii) Section 518.(xiii) Section 527.(xiv) Section 708.(xv) Section 752.(xvi) Section 753.(xvii) Section 755.(xviii) Section 771.(xix) Section 776.(xx) Section 777.(xx.1) Section 807.1.(xxi) Section 808.(xxii) Section 809.(xxiii) Section 810.(xxiv) Section 1109.(xxv) Section 1111.(xxvi) Section 1112(a).(xxvii) Section 1205.1.(xxviii) Section 1205.2.(xxix) Section 1301.(xxx) Section 1302.20250HB1372PN1568 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xxxi) Section 1310.(xxxii) Section 1317.2.(xxxiii) Section 1318.(xxxiv) Section 1326.(xxxv) Section 1327.(xxxvi) Section 1327.2.(xxxvii) Section 1329.(xxxviii) Section 1330.(xxxix) Section 1332.(xl) Section 1333.(xli) Section 1333.1.(xlii) Section 1333.2.(xliii) Section 1333.3.(xliv) Section 1341.(xlv) Section 1342.(xlvi) Section 1343.(xlvii) Section 1344.(xlviii) Section 1345.(xlix) Section 1372(8).(l) Section 1303-A.(li) Section 1518.(lii) Section 1521.(liii) Section 1523.(liv) Section 1531.(lv) Section 1547.(lvi) Section 1702-A.(lvii) Section 1703-A.(lviii) Section 1714-A.(lix) Section 1715-A.(lx) Section 1716-A.20250HB1372PN1568 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (lxi) Section 1716.1-A.[(lxii) Section 1719-A.](lxiii) Section 1721-A.(lxiv) Section 1722-A.(lxv) Section 1723-A(a) and (b).(lxvi) Section 1724-A.(lxvii) Section 1725-A.(lxviii) Section 1727-A.(lxix) Section 1729-A.(lxx) Section 1730-A.(lxxi) Section 1731-A(a)(1) and (b).(lxxii) Section 2014-A.(lxxii.1) Section 2552.(lxxii.2) Subarticle (c.1) of Article XI.(lxxiii) Article XII-A.(lxxiv) Article XIII-A.(lxxv) Article XIV.* * *(7) The requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights) and associated regulations in all public reporting.* * *(d) Open meetings.--The board of trustees of a cyber charter school shall comply with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).Section 17. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1372PN1568 - 51 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526